Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3101
Structured Settlements Transfers Protection Act, how cited.

Sections 25-3101 to 25-3107 shall be known and may be cited as the Structured Settlements Transfers Protection Act.

Laws 2001, LB 55, § 1.